Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.250

Sewerage lien foreclosure—Trial.

A sewerage lien foreclosure action shall be tried before the court without a jury. The court may allow in addition to interest on the service charges at a rate not exceeding eight percent per year from date of delinquency, costs and disbursements as provided by statute and such attorneys' fees as the court may adjudge reasonable.

If the owners and parties interested in any particular tract default, the court may enter judgment of foreclosure and sale as to such parties and tracts and the action may proceed as to the remaining defendants and tracts. The judgment shall specify separately the amount of the sewerage charges, with interest, penalty and costs chargeable to each tract. The judgment shall have the effect of a separate judgment as to each tract described in the judgment, and any appeal shall not invalidate or delay the judgment except as to the property concerning which the appeal is taken. In the judgment the court shall order the tracts therein described sold at one general sale, and an order of sale shall issue pursuant thereto for the enforcement of the judgment. Judgment may be entered as to any one or more separate tracts involved in the action, and the court shall retain jurisdiction of other properties.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.250. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-10, part.]